Maryland, session 2025, HB0463.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
16–105.
(f) (1) Subject to paragraph (3) of this subsection, the Administration may
issue a driver’s license, without first issuing a learner’s instructional permit and without a
waiting period, to any individual who:
(i) Has been licensed regularly to drive in this State, in another
state or country, or by the armed forces of the United States, if the Administration is
satisfied that the applicant’s experience in driving vehicles of the type that would be
authorized by the license class applied for is sufficient to justify issuance of the license
without further training; or
(ii) Has successfully completed the Administration approved basic
motorcycle safety course.
(2) The Administration may:
(i) Examine the applicant’s driving as provided in § 16–110 of this
subtitle; or
– 1 –

Ch. 297 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(ii) Issue a provisional license, if appropriate, under § 16–111(e) of
this subtitle.
(3) An individual who never held a driver’s license issued by the
Administration or by another state, but who otherwise may obtain a license under
paragraph (1)(i) of this subsection without first obtaining a learner’s instructional permit,
shall successfully complete a 3–hour [alcohol and drug education program] ROADWAY
SAFETY DRIVING EDUCATION PROGRAM established by the Administration under §
16–212.1 of this title before qualifying for a driver’s license.
16–212.
(a) The Administration may conduct:
(1) A driver improvement program, including a driver improvement
program designed specifically for young drivers; and
(2) [An alcohol education program] THE 3–HOUR ROADWAY SAFETY
DRIVING EDUCATION PROGRAM ESTABLISHED BY THE ADMINISTRATION UNDER §
16–212.1 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(b) (1) The purpose of the programs authorized under this section is to provide
driver rehabilitation AND EDUCATION.
(2) The Administration shall determine the content of the programs.
(c) If an individual is convicted of one or more moving violations:
(1) Notwithstanding item (2) of this subsection, after a hearing as provided
in Title 12, Subtitle 2 of this article, as a condition of reinstatement of a driver’s license,
the Administration may require an individual to attend a driver improvement program or
[alcohol education program] THE 3–HOUR ROADWAY SAFETY DRIVING EDUCATION
PROGRAM; or
(2) A court may require an individual to attend a driver improvement
program or [alcohol education program] THE 3–HOUR ROADWAY SAFETY DRIVING
EDUCATION PROGRAM.
(d) In carrying out an order of the court, a probation officer or health department
officer may assign an individual to attend a driver improvement program or [alcohol
education program] THE 3–HOUR ROADWAY SAFETY DRIVING EDUCATION
PROGRAM.
(e) (1) An individual who attends a program under this section shall pay, in
advance, a fee as provided in this subsection.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 297
(2) The Administration shall set a reasonable fee based on the costs of
operating the programs authorized by this section.
(3) The funds collected by the Administration under this subsection may
not be credited to the Gasoline and Motor Vehicle Revenue Account for distribution under
§ 8–403 or § 8–404 of this article.
(f) (1) The Administration may waive attendance at [an alcohol education
program] THE 3–HOUR ROADWAY SAFETY DRIVING EDUCATION PROGRAM conducted
by the Administration if an individual attends a private [alcohol education program or an
alcohol education program] ROADWAY SAFETY EDUCATION PROGRAM OR A ROADWAY
SAFETY EDUCATION PROGRAM provided by a political subdivision of the State that is
approved by the Behavioral Health Administration and the Administration.
(2) The Administration may waive attendance at a driver improvement
program conducted by the Administration if an individual attends a private driver
improvement program or a driver improvement program provided by a political subdivision
of the State that is approved by the Administration.
(3) The Administration shall establish criteria for approving private
providers of [alcohol education] ROADWAY SAFETY EDUCATION or driver improvement
programs provided by a political subdivision of the State.
(4) Upon application for approval to provide the programs allowed under
this section, a private provider shall pay an application fee established by the
Administration.
16–212.1.
(a) The Administration, in cooperation with the Behavioral Health
Administration, shall establish [an alcohol and drug education program] THE 3–HOUR
ROADWAY SAFETY DRIVING EDUCATION PROGRAM to educate driver’s license
applicants who are subject to the provisions of § 16–105(f)(3) of this title. This program also
shall be included as part of the driver education course established under Subtitle 5 of this
title.
[(b) The program shall provide 3 hours of instruction in:
(1) The hazards of driving while impaired or intoxicated;
(2) The criminal penalties and administrative sanctions for alcohol and
drug related motor vehicle violations;
(3) The medical, biological, and psychological effects of the consumption of
alcohol and drugs and their impact on the operation of a motor vehicle; and
– 3 –

Ch. 297 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(4) Any other drug and alcohol related information that the Administration
determines would be beneficial to applicants for a driver’s license.
(c) The Administration shall adopt regulations establishing criteria for certifying
a private entity to offer the alcohol and drug education program established under this
section.]
(B) THE 3–HOUR ROADWAY SAFETY DRIVING EDUCATION PROGRAM
SHALL PROVIDE INSTRUCTION ON:
(1) UNDERSTANDING SIGNS, SIGNALS, AND PAVEMENT MARKINGS;
(2) DANGEROUS DRIVING BEHAVIORS;
(3) WORK ZONE SAFETY;
(4) THE HAZARDS OF DRIVING WHILE IMPAIRED OR INTOXICATED;
(5) THE CRIMINAL PENALTIES AND ADMINISTRATIVE SANCTIONS FOR
ALCOHOL– AND DRUG–RELATED MOTOR VEHICLE VIOLATIONS;
(6) THE MEDICAL, BIOLOGICAL, AND PSYCHOLOGICAL EFFECTS OF
THE CONSUMPTION OF ALCOHOL AND DRUGS AND THEIR IMPACT ON THE
OPERATION OF A MOTOR VEHICLE;
(7) THE MARYLAND DRIVING RECORD AND POINTS SYSTEMS; AND
(8) ANY OTHER ROADWAY SAFETY–RELATED INFORMATION THAT
THE ADMINISTRATION DETERMINES WOULD BE BENEFICIAL TO APPLICANTS FOR A
DRIVER’S LICENSE.
(C) THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS ESTABLISHING
CRITERIA FOR CERTIFYING A PRIVATE ENTITY TO OFFER THE 3–HOUR ROADWAY
SAFETY EDUCATION PROGRAM ESTABLISHED UNDER THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 6, 2025.
– 4 –